Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-523
Sidewalks; temporary walks; construction; cost.

Cities of the second class and villages shall have the power to provide for the laying of temporary sidewalks, upon the natural surface of the ground, without regard to grade, on streets not permanently improved, and to provide for the assessment of the cost of such temporary sidewalks on the property in front of which such sidewalks shall be laid.

Laws 1879, § 69, VI, p. 211;

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, VI, p. 173;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, VI, p. 164;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, VI, p. 292;

Laws 1905, c. 29, § 1, p. 255;

R.S.1913, § 5112;

C.S.1922, § 4285;

C.S.1929, § 17-434;

R.S.1943, § 17-523;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 140.

This section governs the construction of temporary sidewalks on ungraded and unimproved streets. Whitla v. Connor, 114 Neb. 526, 208 N.W. 670 (1926).

The terms of this section provide for the construction of temporary, as distinguished from permanent, sidewalk improvements. Gibson v. Troupe, 96 Neb. 770, 148 N.W. 944 (1914).

The provisions for estimates are jurisdictional, and without compliance therewith, there is no authority for a special tax. Moss v. City of Fairbury, 66 Neb. 671, 92 N.W. 721 (1902).

A sidewalk is defined as that portion of a public highway which is set apart by dedication, ordinance, or otherwise for the use of pedestrians. City of Ord v. Nash, 50 Neb. 335, 69 N.W. 964 (1897).